Hawaii statutes.
§507-65 Final demand and notice of sale.
If both notices have been sent, as required by sections 507-63 and 507-64, and
the total sum due has not been paid as specified in the two prior notices, the
owner may prepare for the sale of the occupant's property. The owner shall
then send to the occupant, addressed to the occupant's last known address,
postage prepaid:

(1) A notice of final demand and sale which shall
state all of the following:

(A) That the sums due for rent and charges
demanded have not been paid.

(B) That the occupant's right to use the
designated storage space has been terminated.

(C) That the occupant no longer has access to
the stored property.

(D) That the stored property is subject to a
lien and the amount of the lien.

(E) That the property will be sold to satisfy
the lien after a specified date which is not less than thirty days from the
date of mailing the notice unless prior to the specified date, the lien is paid
in full.

(F) That any excess proceeds of the sale over
the lien amount of costs of sale will be retained by the owner and may be
reclaimed by the occupant, or claimed by another person, at any time for a
period of one year from the sale and that thereafter the proceeds will go to
the State under chapter 523A.

(G) That if the proceeds of sale do not fully
cover the amount of lien and costs, the occupant will be held liable for any
deficiency.

(2) An itemized statement of the owner's claim
showing all sums due at the time of the notice and the date when sums became
due. [L 1984, c 239, pt of §1; am L 1985, c 68, §21]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next